Connecticut, session 2026, SB00088.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) For the purposes of this
section, "scalp cooling system" means any device designed and intended
for repeated medical use to cool the human scalp to prevent or reduce
hair loss as a result of chemotherapy.
(b) (1) Each individual health insurance policy providing coverage of
the type specified in subdivisions (1), (2), (4), (11), (12) and (13) of section
38a-469 of the general statutes delivered, issued for delivery, renewed,
amended or continued in this state on or after January 1, 2027, that
provides coverage for chemotherapy shall provide coverage for scalp
cooling systems used in connection with such chemotherapy that is at
least equivalent to such coverage provided under Medicare.
(2) No policy described in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall
impose a coinsurance, copayment, deductible or other out-of-pocket
expense for any such scalp cooling system that is more restrictive than
LCO No. 527 1 of 3

Governor's Bill No. 88
that imposed on substantially all other benefits provided under such
policy, except that a high deductible health plan, as such term is used in
subsection (f) of section 38a-493 of the general statutes, shall not be
subject to the deductible limits set forth in this subdivision or under
Medicare pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(c) Any individual health insurance policy may require prior
authorization for scalp cooling systems, provided such prior
authorization is required in the same manner and to the same extent as
is required for other covered benefits under such policy.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) For the purposes of this
section, "scalp cooling system" means any device designed and intended
for repeated medical use to cool the human scalp to prevent or reduce
hair loss as a result of chemotherapy.
(b) (1) Each group health insurance policy providing coverage of the
type specified in subdivisions (1), (2), (4), (11), (12) and (13) of section
38a-469 of the general statutes delivered, issued for delivery, renewed,
amended or continued in this state on or after January 1, 2027, that
provides coverage for chemotherapy shall provide coverage for scalp
cooling systems used in connection with such chemotherapy that is at
least equivalent to such coverage provided under Medicare.
(2) No policy described in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall
impose a coinsurance, copayment, deductible or other out-of-pocket
expense for any such scalp cooling system that is more restrictive than
that imposed on substantially all other benefits provided under such
policy, except that a high deductible health plan, as such term is used in
subsection (f) of section 38a-520 of the general statutes, shall not be
subject to the deductible limits set forth in this subdivision or under
Medicare pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(c) Any group health insurance policy may require prior
authorization for scalp cooling systems, provided such prior
authorization is required in the same manner and to the same extent as
LCO No. 527 2 of 3

Governor's Bill No. 88
is required for other covered benefits under such policy.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 January 1, 2027 New section
Sec. 2 January 1, 2027 New section